test/src/older-gt-norm-yamls/V-AI-nipaw_gt-norm.yaml
Condfig:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Verb - nipâw - help : # Wolvengrey VAIv

     nipâw+V+AI+Ind+Prs+1Sg: ninipân
     nipâw+V+AI+Ind+Prs+2Sg: kinipân
     nipâw+V+AI+Ind+Prs+1Pl: ninipânân
     nipâw+V+AI+Ind+Prs+12Pl: [kinipânaw, kinipânânaw]
     nipâw+V+AI+Ind+Prs+2Pl: kinipânâwâw
     nipâw+V+AI+Ind+Prs+3Sg: nipâw
     nipâw+V+AI+Ind+Prs+3Pl: nipâwak
     nipâw+V+AI+Ind+Prs+4Sg/Pl: nipâyiwa
     
     PV/e+nipâw+V+AI+Cnj+Prs+1Sg: [ê-nipâyân, ênipâyân]
     PV/e+nipâw+V+AI+Cnj+Prs+2Sg: [ê-nipâyan, ênipâyan]
     PV/e+nipâw+V+AI+Cnj+Prs+1Pl: [ê-nipâyâhk, ênipâyâhk]
     PV/e+nipâw+V+AI+Cnj+Prs+12Pl: [ê-nipâyahk, ênipâyahk]
     PV/e+nipâw+V+AI+Cnj+Prs+2Pl: [ê-nipâyêk, ênipâyêk]
     PV/e+nipâw+V+AI+Cnj+Prs+3Sg: [ê-nipât, ênipât]
     PV/e+nipâw+V+AI+Cnj+Prs+3Pl: [ê-nipâcik, ênipâcik]
     PV/e+nipâw+V+AI+Cnj+Prs+4Sg/Pl: [ê-nipâyit, ênipâyit]
     
     nipâw+V+AI+Fut+Cond+1Sg: nipâyâni
     nipâw+V+AI+Fut+Cond+2Sg: nipâyani
     nipâw+V+AI+Fut+Cond+1Pl: nipâyâhki
     nipâw+V+AI+Fut+Cond+12Pl: [nipâyahko, nipâyahki]
     nipâw+V+AI+Fut+Cond+2Pl: nipâyêko
     nipâw+V+AI+Fut+Cond+3Sg: nipâci
     nipâw+V+AI+Fut+Cond+3Pl: nipâtwâwi
     nipâw+V+AI+Fut+Cond+4Sg/Pl: nipâyici
     
     nipâw+V+AI+Imp+Imm+2Sg: nipâ
     nipâw+V+AI+Imp+Imm+2Pl: nipâk
     nipâw+V+AI+Imp+Imm+12Pl: nipâtân
     nipâw+V+AI+Imp+Del+2Sg: nipâhkan
     nipâw+V+AI+Imp+Del+2Pl: nipâhkêk
     nipâw+V+AI+Imp+Del+12Pl: nipâhkahk
